Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1065
Federal and other funds; commission; powers.

The commission may apply for any federal or other funds available for next-generation 911 service and may distribute such federal funds consistent with federal law and other funds consistent with the directives, purposes, or conditions of such other funds. Except for intentional acts, the commission shall be immune from liability or the payment of damages in applying for any such federal funds. The state 911 director shall be the designated single point of contact for any federal 911 grant program.

Laws 2018, LB993, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1029.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 47.